Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-885.49
Continuing education and training; purpose.

The purpose of sections 81-885.49 to 81-885.54 is to establish requirements
for continuing education and
training of real estate brokers and salespersons who are licensed
in order to maintain and improve the quality of real estate services provided
to the public.

Laws 1985, LB 101, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB24, § 1.
August 27, 2011